Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB629.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of February 2, 1966 (1965 P.L.1860, No.586), entitled "An act encouraging landowners to make land and water areas available to the public for recreational purposes by limiting liability in connection therewith, and repealing certain acts," is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 2. As used in this act:* * *(6) "Volunteer" means a person who, without compensation, provides services to care for, enhance, preserve, restore or 12345678910111213141516171819 maintain land for recreational purposes.(7) "Volunteer organization" means a nonprofit organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), (4) or (6) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) or an independent, volunteer-based nonprofit organization dedicated to the care, enhancement, preservation, restoration or maintenance of land for a recreational purpose, including the organization's officer or director in any circumstance in which the officer or director is subject to personal liability as a representative of the organization.Section 2. Sections 3 and 4 of the act are amended to read:Section 3. Except as specifically recognized or provided in section 6 of this act, an owner of land, a volunteer or a volunteer organization owes no duty of care to keep the premises safe for entry or use by recreational users, or to give any warning of a dangerous condition, use, structure, or activity on such premises to recreational users.Section 4. Except as specifically recognized by or provided in section 6 of this act, an owner of land who either directly or indirectly invites or permits without charge any recreational user, volunteer or volunteer organization to use such property does not thereby:(1) Extend any assurance that the premises are safe for any purpose.(2) Confer upon such recreational user the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed.(3) Assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to persons or property caused by an act of omission of a recreational user or landowner.(4) Assume responsibility for or incur liability for any 20250HB0629PN0640 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 injury to persons or property, wherever such persons or property are located, caused while hunting as defined in 34 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0629PN0640 - 3 - 1234